Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
PART 3.1 Transfer of Service Credits from Public School Employees Retirement System

47-2-190.
Transfer to Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia prohibited.

Any member who has service credits with the Public School Employees Retirement System may not have any such service credits transferred to the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-2-190

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 575, § 7.